Massachusetts, session 194th, H1520.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 121B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after Section 26D, the
following:
Section 26E: The office of housing and economic development and the office of labor
and workforce development shall establish an apprentice training program to expedite the
reoccupancy of vacant units of state-assisted housing developed through funds provided under
chapter 200 of the acts of 1948, chapter 667 of the acts of 1956, chapter 705 of the acts of 1966,
chapter 689 of the acts of 1974 and chapter 167 of the acts of 1987 and other housing programs
financed through the department of housing and community development.
of 2

The training program shall be developed by the department in consultation with
representatives of local housing authorities, public housing residents, public housing industry
professional organizations, organizations that represent public housing residents, and relevant
state agencies.
The program shall be developed to enable public housing residents to obtain the
education, job skills training, job placement assistance, and long-term follow-up leading to
economic self-sufficiency; provide public housing authorities and public housing capital
assistance teams under Section 26C of Chapter 121B of the General Laws with assistance in the
painting and preparation of vacant units to ready them for occupancy; and to foster the efficient
use of public housing capital and maintenance funds.
The training program shall be called the Brooke Public Housing Apprenticeship program
in honor of former U.S. Senator Edward W. Brooke.
The office of labor and workforce development is authorized to make grants to applicants
for the purpose of providing an apprenticeship program developed under this Section.
of 2